Louisiana, session 2026, HB93.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 404(K) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 404. Appointment of jury commissions; term of office; oath; quorum;
performance of functions of jury commissions in certain parishes
* * *
K. In the parish of Lincoln, the function of the jury commission shall be
performed by the clerk of court of Lincoln Parish or by a deputy clerk of court
designated by the respective clerk in writing to act in his stead in all matters affecting
the jury commission. The clerk of court or his designated deputy shall have the same
powers, duties, and responsibilities and shall be governed by all applicable
provisions of law pertaining to jury commissioners. The clerk of court of Lincoln
Parish shall perform the duties and responsibilities otherwise imposed upon him by
law with respect to jury venires, coordinate the jury venire process, and receive the
compensation generally authorized for a jury commissioner.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.